Hawaii, session 2025, HB1376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 353-16.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The director may effect the transfer of a committed felon to any correctional institution located in another state regardless of whether the state is a member of the Western Interstate Corrections Compact; provided that the institution is in compliance with appropriate health, safety, and sanitation codes of the state, provides a level of program activity for the inmate that is suitable, and is operated by that state, by any of its political subdivisions, or by a private institution; [and] provided further that the transfer is either: (1)  In the interest of the security[,] or management of the correctional institution where the inmate is presently placed, or the reduction of prison overcrowding; or (2)  In the interest of the inmate[.]; provided further that beginning on July 1, 2028, the director shall reduce the number of committed felons incarcerated in private, out-of-state correctional institutions by twenty-five per cent; provided further that beginning on July 1, 2030, the director shall reduce the number of committed felons incarcerated in private, out-of-state correctional institutions by fifty per cent. As used in this section, "private, out-of-state correctional institution" includes any correctional institution outside the State operated for profit or under a public-private partnership." SECTION 2.  The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to convening of the regular sessions of 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, and 2031 on its actions and progress in meeting the reduction in the number of committee felons incarcerated in private, out-of-state correctional institutions as required by this Act. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.